Nevada, session 83, AB454.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.241 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall
establish an emergency operations plan development committee to
develop one plan, which constitutes the minimum requirements of a
plan, to be used by all the public schools other than the charter
schools in the school district in responding to a crisis, emergency or
suicide and all other hazards. The governing body of each charter
school shall establish an emergency operations plan development
committee to develop a plan, which constitutes the minimum
requirements of a plan, to be used by the charter school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
2. The membership of an emergency operations plan
development committee must consist of:
(a) At least one member of the board of trustees or of the
governing body that established the committee;
(b) At least one administrator of a school in the school district or
of the charter school;
(c) At least one licensed teacher of a school in the school district
or of the charter school;
(d) At least one employee of a school in the school district or of
the charter school who is not a licensed teacher and who is not
responsible for the administration of the school;
(e) At least one parent or legal guardian of a pupil who is
enrolled in a school in the school district or in the charter school and
who is not an employee of the school district or charter school;
(f) At least one representative of a local law enforcement agency
in the county in which the school district or charter school is
located;
(g) At least one school police officer, including, without
limitation, a chief of school police of the school district if the school
district has school police officers;
(h) At least one representative of a state or local organization for
emergency management;
(i) At least one representative of the county or district board of
health in the county in which the school district or charter school is
located, designated by the county or district board of health; and
(j) At least one mental health professional, including, without
limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) A counselor of a school in the school district or of the
charter school;
(2) A psychologist of a school in the school district or of the
charter school; or
(3) A licensed social worker of a school in the school district
or of the charter school.
3. The membership of an emergency operations plan
development committee may also include any other person whom
the board of trustees or the governing body deems appropriate,
including, without limitation:
(a) A pupil in grade 10 or higher of a school in the school
district or a pupil in grade 10 or higher of the charter school if a
school in the school district or the charter school includes grade 10
or higher; [and]
(b) An attorney or judge who resides or works in the county in
which the school district or charter school is located [.] ; and
(c) A provider of health care who has specific skills, training
and experience in responding to medical emergencies involving
the heart.
4. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall determine the term of
each member of the emergency operations plan development
committee that it establishes. Each emergency operations plan
development committee may adopt rules for its own management
and government.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means:
(a) A physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS;
(b) A licensed nurse; or
(c) A person who holds a license as an attendant or who is
certified as an emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS or authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic
in this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical
Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by
NRS 450B.145.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 388.243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.243 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee established by the board of trustees of a school district
shall develop one plan, which constitutes the minimum requirements
of a plan, to be used by all the public schools other than the charter
schools in the school district in responding to a crisis, emergency or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
suicide and all other hazards. Each emergency operations plan
development committee established by the governing body of a
charter school shall develop a plan, which constitutes the minimum
requirements of a plan, to be used by the charter school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
Each emergency operations plan development committee shall,
when developing the plan:
(a) Consult with local social service agencies and local public
safety agencies in the county in which its school district or charter
school is located.
(b) If the school district has an emergency manager designated
pursuant to NRS 388.262, consult with the emergency manager.
(c) If the school district has school resource officers, consult
with the school resource officer or a person designated by him or
her.
(d) If the school district has school police officers, consult with
the chief of school police of the school district or a person
designated by him or her.
(e) Consult with the director of the local organization for
emergency management or, if there is no local organization for
emergency management, with the Chief of the Division of
Emergency Management of the Office of the Military or his or her
designee.
(f) Consult with the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee
and a representative of a local government responsible for
enforcement of the ordinances, codes or other regulations governing
fire safety.
(g) Determine which persons and organizations in the
community, including, without limitation, a provider of mental
health services which is operated by a state or local agency, that
could be made available to assist pupils and staff in recovering from
a crisis, emergency or suicide.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The plans, procedures and information included in the model
plan developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.253;
(b) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency and
for responding during the period after a crisis or an emergency has
concluded, including, without limitation, a crisis or an emergency
that results in immediate physical harm to a pupil or employee of a
school in the school district or the charter school;
(c) A procedure for enforcing discipline within a school in the
school district or the charter school and for obtaining and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
maintaining a safe and orderly environment during a crisis or an
emergency;
(d) The names of persons and organizations in the community,
including, without limitation, a provider of mental health services
which is operated by a state or local agency, that are available to
provide counseling and other services to pupils and staff of the
school to assist them in recovering from a crisis, emergency or
suicide;
(e) A plan for making the persons and organizations described in
paragraph (d) available to pupils and staff after a crisis, emergency
or suicide;
(f) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency that
occurs during an extracurricular activity which takes place on school
grounds;
(g) A plan which includes strategies to assist pupils and staff at a
school in recovering from a suicide;
(h) A description of the organizational structure which ensures
there is a clearly defined hierarchy of authority and responsibility
used by the school for the purpose of responding to a crisis,
emergency or suicide;
(i) If the school district has school police officers, a plan to
coordinate with local law enforcement agencies to train school
police officers in active assailant movement techniques;
(j) A plan to coordinate with local law enforcement agencies or
public safety organizations to provide active assailant trainings to
each employee of the school;
(k) A plan to provide support to:
(1) Pupils who have experienced a crisis or emergency by
using trauma-informed and age-appropriate resources; and
(2) Members of the faculty and staff who have experienced a
crisis or emergency by using trauma-informed resources;
(l) A plan to ensure that members of the faculty and staff and a
pupil’s parents or legal guardians are notified of the occurrence,
development and conclusion of a crisis or an emergency through
any communication method established by a school, including,
without limitation, communicating through text message or
electronic mail; [and]
(m) A plan to inform, at least twice each academic year, a
pupil’s parent or legal guardian of any state requirement related to
the storage of firearms, including, without limitation, the crimes and
penalties described in subsection 5 of NRS 202.300 and 202.3623
[.] ; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(n) A plan for immediately responding to a medical emergency
involving the heart, including, without limitation, a person in
cardiac arrest.
3. Each emergency operations plan development committee
shall provide for review a copy of the plan that it develops pursuant
to this section to the board of trustees of the school district that
established the committee or the governing body of the charter
school that established the committee.
4. The board of trustees of the school district that established
the committee or the governing body of the charter school that
established the committee shall submit for review to the Division of
Emergency Management of the Office of the Military the plan
developed pursuant to this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388.249 and 388.251,
each public school must comply with the plan developed for it
pursuant to this section.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Active assailant movement techniques” means any training
in the technical and tactical skills necessary for school police
officers to respond to a crisis or emergency concerning an active
assailant.
(b) “Active assailant training” means any training in responding
to a crisis or emergency concerning an active assailant that is
necessary to evacuate or secure the school.
Sec. 1.4. NRS 389.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.021 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations
establishing courses of study and the grade levels for which the
courses of study apply for:
(a) The academic subjects set forth in NRS 389.018. A course of
study in health prescribed pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3
of NRS 389.018 must, for pupils enrolled in middle school, junior
high school or high school, including, without limitation, pupils
enrolled in those grade levels at a charter school, include instruction
in:
(1) The administration of hands-only or compression-only
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including a psychomotor skill-based
component, according to the guidelines of the American Red Cross
or American Heart Association;
(2) The use of an automated external defibrillator; and
(3) Organ and tissue donation, including, without limitation:
(I) How to register as a donor and the rules governing
donor gifts in this State pursuant to NRS 451.500 to 451.598,
inclusive;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(II) The societal and individual benefits of organ and
tissue donation; and
(III) Facts about organ and tissue donation.
(b) Citizenship and physical training for pupils enrolled in high
school.
(c) Physiology, hygiene and, except as otherwise prescribed by
paragraph (a), cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
(d) The prevention of suicide.
(e) Instruction relating to child abuse.
(f) The economics of the American system of free enterprise.
(g) American Sign Language.
(h) Environmental education.
(i) Adult roles and responsibilities.
 A course of study established for paragraph (a) may include one
or more of the subjects listed in paragraphs (b) to (i), inclusive.
2. A teacher who provides instruction pursuant to
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 is not
required to hold certification in the administration of
cardiopulmonary resuscitation unless required by the board of
trustees of the school district [pursuant to NRS 391.092] or [by] the
governing body of the charter school [.] pursuant to NRS 391.092.
3. The board of trustees of the school district, the governing
body of the charter school or the governing body of the university
school for profoundly gifted pupils may collaborate with entities to
assist in the provision of the instruction required pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and the provision of equipment
necessary for the instruction, including, without limitation, fire
departments, hospitals, colleges and universities and public health
agencies.
4. A pupil who is enrolled in a course of study in health
through a program of distance education or a pupil with a disability
who cannot perform the tasks included in the instruction required
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 is not required to complete
the instruction to pass the course of study in health.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 391.092 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.092 1. The board of trustees of each school district [:]
and the governing body of each charter school:
(a) Shall establish a plan for the teachers and other licensed
educational personnel in the school district or charter school, as
applicable, who teach or supervise pupils in physical education [;]
and each coach, manager or athletic trainer in the school district
or charter school who is not a pupil; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) May establish a plan for the teachers and other licensed
educational personnel in the school district or charter school, as
applicable, who teach or supervise pupils in courses of study or
activities other than physical education which involve a high risk
that cardiopulmonary resuscitation will need to be administered
during the course of study or activity,
 to receive the training which is necessary for certification in the
administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
2. A plan established by the board of trustees pursuant to
subsection 1 must:
(a) Comply with the guidelines established by the American
National Red Cross or the American Heart Association for the
certification of persons in the administration of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation;
(b) Set forth the courses of study and activities offered at
schools within the district or the charter school, as applicable,
other than physical education which involve a high risk that
cardiopulmonary resuscitation will need to be administered during
the course of study or activity, including, without limitation,
laboratory sciences, vocational education, special education,
competitive sports and the transportation of pupils; and
(c) Set forth an estimation of the time and resources necessary
for all personnel of the district or charter school, as applicable, to
obtain certification in the administration of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation.
3. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall submit to the State
Board any plan that it establishes pursuant to subsection 1.
4. A teacher or other person who:
(a) Is licensed pursuant to this chapter; and
(b) Teaches or supervises:
(1) Physical education; or
(2) A course of study or an activity that the board of trustees
of the school district in which the person is employed or the charter
school at which the person is employed has identified as involving
a high risk that cardiopulmonary resuscitation will need to be
administered during the course of study or activity and for which the
board of trustees or governing body, as applicable, has established a
plan pursuant to subsection 1,
 shall establish and maintain current certification in the
administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation in accordance with
the plan established by the board of trustees [.] or governing body,
as applicable.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
5. A coach, manager or other person who is associated with a
school athletic activity in the school district or charter school and
who is not a pupil shall establish and maintain current
certification in the administration of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation in accordance with the plan established by the board
of trustees or governing body, as applicable.
6. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may enter into an agreement with a local
fire department, a local law enforcement agency or a nonprofit
organization to provide the training and certification required by the
plan.
7. As used in this section, “school athletic activity” means:
(a) An interscholastic activity or event governed by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association pursuant to chapter 385B of
NRS;
(b) Any other interscholastic athletic activity or event involving
an organized athletic game or competition against another team or
entity; or
(c) Any practice or preparation for an interscholastic activity
or event described in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. Chapter 394 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. 1. The governing body of each private school that
operates as a high school shall establish a plan for each coach,
manager or athletic trainer of the private school who is not a pupil
to receive the training which is necessary for certification in the
administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
2. A plan established by the governing body of a private
school pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Comply with the guidelines established by the American
National Red Cross or the American Heart Association for the
certification of persons in the administration of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation; and
(b) Set forth an estimation of the time and resources necessary
for coaches, managers and other persons associated with a school
athletic activity of the private school who are not pupils to obtain
certification in the administration of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation.
3. A coach, manager or other person who is associated with a
school athletic activity of the private school and who is not a pupil
shall establish and maintain current certification in the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation in accordance
with the plan established by the governing body of the private
school.
4. The governing body of a private school may enter into an
agreement with a local fire department, a local law enforcement
agency or a nonprofit organization to provide the training and
certification required by the plan.
5. As used in this section, “school athletic activity” means:
(a) An interscholastic activity or event governed by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association pursuant to chapter 385B or
NRS;
(b) Any other interscholastic athletic activity or event involving
an organized athletic game or competition against another team or
entity; or
(c) Any practice or preparation for an interscholastic activity
or event described in paragraph (a) or (b).
Secs. 6-8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8.3. NRS 394.1685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.1685 1. The governing body of each private school shall
establish an emergency operations plan development committee to
develop a plan to be used by the private school in responding to a
crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
2. The membership of an emergency operations plan
development committee consists of:
(a) At least one member of the governing body;
(b) At least one administrator of the school;
(c) At least one teacher of the school;
(d) At least one employee of the school who is not a teacher and
who is not responsible for the administration of the school;
(e) At least one parent or legal guardian of a pupil who is
enrolled in the school and who is not an employee of the school;
(f) At least one representative of a local law enforcement agency
in the county in which the school is located; and
(g) At least one representative of a state or local organization for
emergency management.
3. The membership of an emergency operations plan
development committee may also include any other person whom
the governing body deems appropriate, including, without
limitation:
(a) A counselor of the school;
(b) A psychologist of the school;
(c) A licensed social worker of the school;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(d) A pupil in grade 10 or higher of the school if the school
includes grade 10 or higher; [and]
(e) An attorney or judge who resides or works in the county in
which the school is located [.] ; and
(f) A provider of health care who has specific skills, training
and experience in responding to medical emergencies involving
the heart.
4. The governing body of each private school shall determine
the term of each member of the emergency operations plan
development committee that it established. Each emergency
operations plan development committee may adopt rules for its own
management and government.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means:
(a) A physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS;
(b) A licensed nurse; or
(c) A person who holds a license as an attendant or who is
certified as an emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS or authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic
in this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical
Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by
NRS 450B.145.
Sec. 8.7. NRS 394.1687 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.1687 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee shall develop a plan to be used by its school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
Each emergency operations plan development committee shall,
when developing the plan:
(a) Consult with local social service agencies and local public
safety agencies in the county in which its school is located.
(b) Consult with the director of the local organization for
emergency management or, if there is no local organization for
emergency management, with the Chief of the Division of
Emergency Management of the Office of the Military or his or her
designee.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The plans, procedures and information included in the model
plan developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.253;
(b) A procedure for immediately responding to a crisis or an
emergency and for responding during the period after a crisis or an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
emergency has concluded, including, without limitation, a crisis or
an emergency that results in immediate physical harm to a pupil or
employee of the school; [and]
(c) A procedure for enforcing discipline within the school and
for obtaining and maintaining a safe and orderly environment during
a crisis or an emergency [.] ; and
(d) A plan for immediately responding to a medical emergency
involving the heart, including, without limitation, a person in
cardiac arrest.
3. Each emergency operations plan development committee
shall provide for review a copy of the plan that it develops pursuant
to this section to the governing body of the school that established
the committee.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 394.1691 and
394.1692, each private school must comply with the plan developed
for it pursuant to this section.
Sec. 8.9. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)